Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2230.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. Sections 1 through 6, and amendments thereto, shall be
known and may be cited as the kratom consumer protection act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 1 through 6, and amendments thereto:
(a) "Food" means a food product, food ingredient, dietary ingredient,
dietary supplement or beverage for human consumption;
(b) "kratom extract" means a food product or dietary ingredient
containing any part of the leaf of the plant mitragyna speciosa that has
been extracted or concentrated in order to provide more standardized
product content;
(c) "kratom product" means a food product or dietary ingredient
containing any part of the leaf of the plant mitragyna speciosa or an extract
thereof and is manufactured as a powder, capsule, tablet, beverage or other
edible form;
(d) "processor" means a person that sells, prepares, manufactures,
distributes or maintains kratom products or advertises, represents or holds
itself out as selling, preparing or maintaining kratom products;
(e) "retailer" means any person that sells, distributes, advertises,
represents or holds itself out as selling or maintaining kratom products;
and
(f) "secretary" means the secretary of agriculture.
Sec. 3. A processor shall not prepare, distribute, sell or expose for
sale any of the following:
(a) A kratom product that is adulterated with a dangerous non-kratom
substance. A kratom product is adulterated with a dangerous non-kratom
substance if the kratom product is mixed or packed with a non-kratom
substance and that substance affects the quality or strength of the kratom
product to such a degree as to render the kratom product injurious to a
consumer;

HB 2230 2
(b) a kratom product that is contaminated with a dangerous non-
kratom substance. A kratom product is contaminated with a dangerous
non-kratom substance if the kratom product contains a poisonous or
otherwise deleterious non-kratom ingredient, including, but not limited to,
the substances listed in K.S.A. 65-4101 et. seq., and amendments thereto,
and analogs (cf. 65-4101) of those substances;
(c) a kratom extract that contains levels of residual solvents higher
than is allowed in United States pharmacopeia chapter 467;
(d) a kratom product containing a level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in
the alkaloid fraction that is greater than 1% of the overall alkaloid
composition of the product;
(e) a kratom product containing any synthetic alkaloids, including
synthetic mitragynine, synthetic 7-hydroxymitragynine or any other
synthetically derived compounds of the kratom plant; or
(f) a kratom product that does not provide labeling directions
necessary for safe use by consumers, including a recommended serving
size, and the name and address of the manufacturer. Each kratom product
label shall contain the following: WARNING: The U.S. Food and Drug
Administration has not approved kratom for medical use. If you are
pregnant or nursing a baby, seek the advice of a health care professional
before using this product.
Sec. 4. A processor shall not distribute, sell or expose for sale a
kratom product to an individual under 21 years of age.
Sec. 5. (a) A processor that violates section 3 or 4, and amendments
thereto, shall be subject to a fine for a first offense of not more than $1,000
and for a second or subsequent offense of not more than $2,000. Upon the
request of a person to whom an administrative fine is issued, the director
shall conduct a hearing in accordance with K.S.A. 77-501 et seq, and
amendments thereto.
(b) A retailer does not violate section 3, and amendments thereto, if it
is shown by a preponderance of the evidence that the retailer relied in good
faith upon the representations of a manufacturer, processor, packer or
distributor of food represented to be a kratom product.
Sec. 6. The secretary of agriculture shall adopt rules and regulations
to administer sections 1 through 6, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 7. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.